Illinois, session 104th, SB1548.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing Section 62605-485 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-485)8    Sec. 2605-485. Endangered Missing Person Advisory.9    (a) A coordinated program known as the Endangered Missing 10Person Advisory is established within the Illinois State 11Police. The purpose of the Endangered Missing Person Advisory 12is to provide a regional system for the rapid dissemination of 13information regarding a missing person who is believed to be a 14high-risk missing person as defined in Section 10 of the 15Missing Persons Identification Act.16    (b) The AMBER Plan Task Force, established under Section 172605-480 of this Law, shall serve as the task force for the 18Endangered Missing Person Advisory. The AMBER Plan Task Force 19shall monitor and review the implementation and operation of 20the regional system developed under subsection (a), including 21procedures, budgetary requirements, and response protocols. 22The AMBER Plan Task Force shall also develop additional 23network resources for use in the system.  SB1548 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10471 RTM 20546 b1    (c) The Illinois State Police, in coordination with the 2Illinois Department on Aging, shall develop and implement a 3community outreach program to promote awareness among the 4State's healthcare facilities, nursing homes, assisted living 5facilities, and other senior centers. The guidelines and 6procedures shall ensure that specific health information about 7the missing person is not made public through the alert or 8otherwise.9    (c-5) Subject to appropriation, the Illinois State Police, 10in coordination with the Illinois Department of Human 11Services, shall develop and implement a community outreach 12program to promote awareness of the Endangered Missing Person 13Advisory among applicable entities, including, but not limited 14to, developmental disability facilities as defined in Section 151-107 of the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 16Code. The outreach program may also promote awareness of the 17Endangered Missing Person Advisory to people with 18developmental disabilities, as defined in Section 1-116 of the 19Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code, communities 20of people with developmental disabilities, and organizations 21that serve people with developmental disabilities. The 22guidelines and procedures shall ensure that specific health 23information about the missing person is not made public 24through the alert or otherwise. 25    (d) The Child Safety Coordinator, created under Section 262605-480 of this Law, shall act in the dual capacity of Child   SB1548 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10471 RTM 20546 b1Safety Coordinator and Endangered Missing Person Coordinator. 2The Coordinator shall assist in the establishment of State 3standards and monitor the availability of federal funding that 4may become available to further the objectives of the 5Endangered Missing Person Advisory. The Illinois State Police 6shall provide technical assistance for the Coordinator from 7its existing resources.8    (e)(1) The Illinois State Police, in cooperation with the 9Silver Search Task Force, shall develop as part of the 10Endangered Missing Person Advisory a coordinated statewide 11awareness program and toolkit to be used when a person 21 years 12of age or older who is believed to have Alzheimer's disease, 13other related dementia, or other dementia-like cognitive 14impairment is reported missing, which shall be referred to as 15Silver Search.16    (2) The Illinois State Police shall complete development 17and deployment of the Silver Search Awareness Program and 18toolkit on or before July 1, 2017.19    (3) The Illinois State Police shall establish a Silver 20Search Task Force within 90 days after the effective date of 21this amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly to assist the 22Illinois State Police in development and deployment of the 23Silver Search Awareness Program and toolkit. The Task Force 24shall establish the criteria and create a toolkit, which may 25include usage of Department of Transportation signs, under 26Section 2705-505.6 of the Department of Transportation Law of   SB1548 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10471 RTM 20546 b1the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. The Task Force 2shall monitor and review the implementation and operation of 3that program, including procedures, budgetary requirements, 4standards, and minimum requirements for the training of law 5enforcement personnel on how to interact appropriately and 6effectively with individuals that suffer from Alzheimer's 7disease, other dementia, or other dementia-like cognitive 8impairment. The Task Force shall also develop additional 9network and financial resources for use in the system. The 10Task Force shall include, but is not limited to, one 11representative from each of the following:12        (A) the Illinois State Police;13        (B) the Department on Aging;14        (C) the Department of Public Health;15        (D) the Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards 16    Board;17        (E) the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and 18    Office of Homeland Security;19        (F) the Secretary of State;20        (G) the Department of Transportation; 21        (H) the Department of the Lottery;22        (I) the Illinois Toll Highway Authority; 23        (J) a State association dedicated to Alzheimer's care, 24    support, and research;25        (K) a State association dedicated to improving quality 26    of life for persons age 50 and over;  SB1548 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 10471 RTM 20546 b1        (L) a State group of area agencies involved in 2    planning and coordinating services and programs for older 3    persons in their respective areas;4        (M) a State organization dedicated to enhancing 5    communication and cooperation between sheriffs;6        (N) a State association of police chiefs and other 7    leaders of police and public safety organizations;8        (O) a State association representing Illinois 9    publishers; 10        (P) a State association that advocates for the 11    broadcast industry; 12        (Q) a member of a large wireless telephone carrier; 13    and14        (R) a member of a small wireless telephone carrier. 15    The members of the Task Force designated in subparagraphs 16(A) through (I) of this paragraph (3) shall be appointed by the 17head of the respective agency. The members of the Task Force 18designated in subparagraphs (J) through (R) of this paragraph 19(3) shall be appointed by the Director of the Illinois State 20Police. The Director of the Illinois State Police or his or her 21designee shall serve as Chair of the Task Force. 22    The Task Force shall meet at least twice a year and shall 23provide a report on the operations of the Silver Search 24Program to the General Assembly and the Governor each year by 25June 30.26    (4) Subject to appropriation, the Illinois State Police,   SB1548 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 10471 RTM 20546 b1in coordination with the Department on Aging and the Silver 2Search Task Force, shall develop and implement a community 3outreach program to promote awareness of the Silver Search 4Program as part of the Endangered Missing Person Advisory 5among law enforcement agencies, the State's healthcare 6facilities, nursing homes, assisted living facilities, other 7senior centers, and the general population on or before 8January 1, 2017.9    (5) The Child Safety Coordinator, created under Section 102605-480 of this Law, shall act in the capacity of Child Safety 11Coordinator, Endangered Missing Person Coordinator, and Silver 12Search Program Coordinator. The Coordinator, in conjunction 13with the members of the Task Force, shall assist the Illinois 14State Police and the Silver Search Task Force in the 15establishment of State standards and monitor the availability 16of federal and private funding that may become available to 17further the objectives of the Endangered Missing Person 18Advisory and Silver Search Awareness Program. The Illinois 19State Police shall provide technical assistance for the 20Coordinator from its existing resources. 21    (6) The Illinois State Police shall provide administrative 22and other support to the Task Force. 23(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)